Maine, session 132, LD1607.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2803-B, sub-§1, ¶N, as amended by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A,
§8, is further amended to read:
N. Unannounced execution of search warrants; and
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §2803-B, sub-§1, ¶O, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A, §9,
is amended to read:
O. By January 1, 2024, the confidentiality of attorney-client communications, which
must include, at a minimum, processes to protect and ensure confidentiality of
attorney‑client communications and processes to be followed in the event that there is
a breach of attorney‑client confidentiality.;
Sec. 3. 25 MRSA §2803-B, sub-§1, ¶P is enacted to read:
P. By January 1, 2026, requirements for the law enforcement agency to assist a
prosecuting agency in complying with the prosecuting agency's constitutional
obligations under Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83 (1963) and Giglio v. United States,
405 U.S. 150 (1972); and
Sec. 4. 25 MRSA §2803-B, sub-§1, ¶Q is enacted to read:
Q. By January 1, 2026, requirements for the law enforcement agency to comply with
mandatory disclosures to the Maine Criminal Justice Academy.
Page 1 - 132LR2446(03)